Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1702HV (2) 91 jm/md H.F. 1050 Section 1. Section 427A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. Notwithstanding the other provisions 3 of this section, aboveground storage tanks with a capacity 4 of ninety-one thousand gallons or less, no matter the use or 5 intended use in the subject property, shall not be assessed and 6 taxed as real property. 7 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION. Section 25B.7 shall not apply to 8 this Act. 9 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 10 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 11 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 12 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 13 1, 2025. 14